Utah statutes.
41-1a-1104.   Disposition of proceeds from sale.

(1)  If, for purposes of this part and Section 41-1a-1301, the ownership of a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor seized cannot be determined, the excess of the proceeds of any sale over the fees for registration or transfer and penalties and costs shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a suspense account.

(2) (a)  If the owner or the owner's heirs or assigns file a claim for the excess of the proceeds within one year of date of sale of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, the excess of the proceeds shall be refunded to the claimant.

(b)  If a claim is not filed in accordance with Subsection (2)(a), then the money shall be deposited in the General Fund.



Amended by Chapter 56, 2005 General Session

